District of Columbia statutes.
20-356

Applicability of other provisions of title.

Except to the extent inconsistent with this subchapter, all the other provisions of this title shall apply to small estates.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

History

1981 Ed., § 20-356.

Prior Codifications